Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-12,114
Act, how cited.

Sections 25-12,112 to 25-12,114 may be cited as the Uniform Photographic Copies of Business and Public Records as Evidence Act.

Laws 1951, c. 56, § 3, p. 189.